Connecticut, session 2026, SB00157.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 17a-101 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) The following persons shall be mandated reporters: (1) Any
physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 370, (2)
any resident physician or intern in any hospital in this state, whether or
not so licensed, (3) any registered nurse, (4) any licensed practical nurse,
(5) any medical examiner, (6) any dentist, (7) any dental hygienist, (8)
any psychologist, (9) any school employee, as defined in section 53a-65,
(10) any social worker, (11) any person who holds or is issued a coaching
permit by the State Board of Education, is a coach of intramural or
interscholastic athletics and is eighteen years of age or older, (12) any
individual who is employed as a coach or director of youth athletics and
is eighteen years of age or older, (13) any individual who is employed
as a coach or director of a private youth sports organization, league or
team and is eighteen years of age or older, (14) any paid administrator,
faculty, staff, athletic director, athletic coach or athletic trainer employed
by a public or private institution of higher education who is eighteen
years of age or older, excluding student employees, (15) any police

Substitute Senate Bill No. 157
officer, (16) any juvenile or adult probation officer, (17) any juvenile or
adult parole officer, (18) any member of the clergy, (19) any pharmacist,
(20) any physical therapist, (21) any optometrist, (22) any chiropractor,
(23) any podiatrist, (24) any mental health professional, (25) any
physician assistant, (26) any person who is a licensed or certified
emergency medical services provider, (27) any person who is a licensed
or certified alcohol and drug counselor, (28) any person who is a
licensed marital and family therapist, (29) any person who is a sexual
assault counselor or a domestic violence counselor, as defined in section
52-146k, (30) any person who is a licensed professional counselor, (31)
any person who is a licensed foster parent, (32) any person paid to care
for a child in any public or private facility, child care center, group child
care home or family child care home licensed by the state, (33) any
employee of the Department of Children and Families or any person
who, in the performance of such person's duties, has regular contact
with and provides services to or on behalf of children pursuant to a
contract with or credential issued by the Department of Children and
Families, (34) any employee of the Office of Early Childhood who is
responsible for the licensing of child care centers, group child care
homes, family child care homes or youth camps, (35) any paid [youth
camp] director, assistant director and staff member of a youth camp, as
defined in section 19a-420, or a youth camp operated by a municipal
agency, who is twenty-one years of age or older, (36) the Child Advocate
and any employee of the Office of the Child Advocate, (37) any person
who is a licensed behavior analyst, (38) any family relations counselor,
family relations counselor trainee or family services supervisor
employed by the Judicial Department, (39) any victim services advocate
employed by the Office of Victim Services within the Judicial
Department, (40) any employee of a juvenile justice program operated
by or pursuant to a contract with the Court Support Services Division of
the Judicial Department, and (41) any person employed, including any
person employed under contract and any independent ombudsperson,
to work at a juvenile detention facility or any other facility where
Public Act No. 26-25 2 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 157
children under eighteen years of age are detained and who has direct
contact with children as part of such employment.
Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Office
of Early Childhood, in consultation with a state-wide association
advocating on behalf of municipal parks and recreation departments, a
state-wide organization advocating for the interests of small towns and
a state-wide organization of municipal leaders, shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to children. Such report shall include, but
need not be limited to, a list of each municipal youth camp in the state,
and details concerning (1) the physical environment and types of
facilities and settings in which each such camp operates, (2) the number
and age range of children served by each such camp in the prior
calendar year, (3) the number of individuals employed by each such
camp in the prior calendar year, (4) each such camp's operating
schedule, including the dates during which children attended each such
camp in the prior calendar year, (5) whether each such camp requires
employees to receive training in emergency first aid or
cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and, if so, how often such training is
required, (6) whether each such camp authorizes employees to
administer medication to children and offers training to employees
concerning the administration of medication, (7) whether each such
camp accepts child care assistance subsidy payments, (8) whether each
such camp maintains written policies and procedures concerning
employee hiring and training or the safety and maintenance of facilities
and equipment, (9) whether each such camp conducts criminal
background checks on prospective or current employees, and (10) the
extent to which each such camp's written policies and procedures
comport with regulatory requirements pertaining to youth camps, as
defined in section 19a-420 of the general statutes, licensed by the Office
of Early Childhood.
Public Act No. 26-25 3 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 157
Governor's Action:
Approved May 20, 2026
Public Act No. 26-25 4 of 4